Washington statutes.
RCW 39.30.010

Executory conditional sales contracts for purchase of property—Limit on indebtedness—Election, when.

Any city or town or metropolitan park district or county or library district may execute an executory conditional sales contract with a county or counties, the state or any of its political subdivisions, the government of the United States, or any private party for the purchase of any real or personal property, or property rights in connection with the exercise of any powers or duties which they now or hereafter are authorized to exercise, if the entire amount of the purchase price specified in such contract does not result in a total indebtedness in excess of three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such library district or the maximum amount of nonvoter-approved indebtedness authorized in such county, city, town, or metropolitan park district. If such a proposed contract would result in a total indebtedness in excess of this amount, a proposition in regard to whether or not such a contract may be executed shall be submitted to the voters for approval or rejection in the same manner that bond issues for capital purposes are submitted to the voters. Any city or town or metropolitan park district or county or library district may jointly execute contracts authorized by this section, if the entire amount of the purchase price does not result in a joint total indebtedness in excess of the nonvoter-approved indebtedness limitation of any city, town, metropolitan park district, county, or library district that participates in the jointly executed contract. The term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

[ 1997 c 361 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 26; 1963 c 92 s 1; 1961 c 158 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.